Missouri, session 2026, HB1674.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.1250, to read as follows:
537.1250. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Act
Against Abusive Website Access Litigation".
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Access violation", any allegation that a public accommodation does not
provide sufficient access under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act or under
state law or any other similar allegation under state or federal law;
(b) "Public accommodation", the same as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000 et
seq. For the purposes of this section, "public accommodation" includes a website
operated by a resident of this state;
(c) "Resident of this state", any person residing in Missouri and any entity that
has filed with the Missouri secretary of state's office under chapter 351.
2. (1) The attorney general, on behalf of a class of residents of this state, under
section 507.070 who are subject to litigation that alleges any website access violation,
and any resident of this state who is subject to litigation that alleges any website access
violation may file a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction within this state
against the party, attorney, or law firm that initiated such litigation for a determination
as to whether such litigation alleging a website access violation is abusive litigation.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1674 2
(2) In determining whether any litigation that alleges any website access
violation constitutes abusive litigation, the trier of fact shall consider the totality of the
circumstances to determine if the primary purpose of the litigation that alleges a website
access violation is obtaining a payment from a defendant due to the costs of defending
the action in court. For the purposes of making this determination, the trier of fact may
assess the following factors and any other factors the trier of fact deems relevant:
(a) The number of substantially similar actions filed by the same plaintiff,
lawyer, or law firm and any history of such plaintiff, lawyer, or law firm bringing
frivolous litigation or other litigation declared by a court to be abusive litigation in the
past ten years;
(b) The number of full-time employees employed by the defendant and the
resources available to the defendant to engage in the litigation;
(c) The resources available to the defendant to correct the alleged website access
violation;
(d) Whether the jurisdiction or venue where the action is brought is a substantial
obstacle to defending against the litigation;
(e) Whether the filing party or lawyer filing the litigation is a resident of this
state or is licensed to practice law in this state;
(f) The nature of settlement discussions and the reasonableness of settlement
offers and refusals to settle. The application of such settlement information shall be
used only as provided by this section and shall not otherwise alter the rules of evidence
applicable to such court; and
(g) Whether any factors under Missouri supreme court rule 55.03(c) exist in the
litigation and whether sanctions are appropriate under Missouri supreme court rule
55.03(d).
(3) Except as provided further, if the defendant in any litigation that alleges a
website access violation in good faith attempts to correct the alleged violation within
thirty days after being provided written notice or being served a petition or complaint
with sufficient detail to identify and correct the alleged violation, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the subsequent initiation or continuance of litigation that
alleges a website access violation constitutes abusive litigation. There shall not be a
rebuttable presumption that such litigation is abusive litigation if the alleged website
access violation is not corrected, as determined by the court, within ninety days after
being provided written notice or being served a petition or complaint with sufficient
detail to identify and correct the alleged violation. The trier of fact shall not determine
whether such litigation is abusive litigation until after such ninety-day period expires or
the alleged violation is corrected, as determined by the court, whichever occurs first.

HB 1674 3
3. If the attorney general determines in writing that the litigation alleging a
website access violation is not abusive and such written determination is attached to the
petition in the litigation alleging a website access violation, there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that such litigation is not abusive.
4. If the trier of fact determines that an initiator of an action under subsection 2
of this section is a defendant in abusive litigation, the court may award reasonable
attorney's fees and costs in bringing the action under subsection 2 of this section as well
as defending against the abusive litigation to be paid by the party bringing the abusive
litigation. In addition, the court may award punitive damages or sanctions not to exceed
three times the amount of attorney's fees awarded by the court.
5. At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a website access violation, the court
shall review any determination that such litigation is abusive and any award of
attorney's fees under the Missouri rules of professional conduct to determine the
reasonableness of the award before issuing a judgment. The results obtained in the
litigation alleging a website access violation shall be weighed heavily, particularly if the
litigation was resolved in favor of the plaintiff.
6. If the federal Department of Justice issues standards concerning website
accessibility under Title III of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, the attorney
general shall notify the revisor of statutes that such standards have been issued. Upon
receipt of such notification by the revisor, the provisions of this section shall expire.
✔